Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 103A.8E Radon mitigation requirements. The commissioner shall adopt as part of the state building code a requirement that new single-family or two-family residential construction must include a passive method for the mitigation of radon listed in appendix AF of the international residential code, 2021 edition, published by the international code council. The requirement shall only apply to single-family or two-family residential construction commenced after the adoption of the requirement. Sec. 2. Section 103A.10, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: House File 2297, p. 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Provisions of the state building code relating to radon mitigation requirements shall be applicable to all new single-family and two-family residential construction in this state. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2297, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor